Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.020

Employee suggestion program—Rules for administration of chapter.

(1) The board shall formulate, establish, and maintain a statewide employee suggestion program and adopt rules to allow for agency unique suggestion programs. Employee suggestion programs are developed to encourage and reward meritorious suggestions by state employees that will promote efficiency and economy in the performance of any function of state government: PROVIDED, That the program shall include provisions for the processing of suggestions having multiagency impact and post-implementation auditing of suggestions for fiscal accountability.

(2) The board shall adopt rules necessary or appropriate for the proper administration and for the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter. These rules shall include the adoption of a payment award schedule that establishes the criteria for determining the amounts of any financial or other awards under this chapter.

(3) The board shall prepare a topical list of all the productivity awards granted and disseminate this information to the legislature and all state government agencies that may be able to adapt them to their procedures.

[ 2023 c 106 s 2; 1999 c 50 s 3; 1995 c 181 s 1; 1993 c 467 s 3; 1982 c 167 s 7; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 122 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 152 s 4; 1965 ex.s. c 142 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 467: See note following RCW 41.60.010.

Severability—1982 c 167: See note following RCW 41.60.015.